Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1708
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and enforcement of the Farm Labor Contractors Act.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 8.